Maine, session 132, LD1602.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§11, ¶A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 437, §10, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) A sale in the ordinary course of business by a retailer to a purchaser who is not
engaged in selling that kind of tangible personal property or taxable service in the
ordinary course of repeated and successive transactions of like character; and
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§11, ¶A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 437, §10, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) The sale or liquidation of a business or the sale of substantially all of the assets
of a business, to the extent that the seller purchased the assets of the business for
resale, lease or rental in the ordinary course of business, except when:
(a) The sale is to an affiliated entity and the transferee, or ultimate transferee
in a series of transactions among affiliated entities, purchases the assets for
resale, lease or rental in the ordinary course of business; or
(b) The sale is to a person that purchases the assets for resale, lease or rental
in the ordinary course of business or that purchases the assets for transfer to an
affiliate, directly or through a series of transactions among affiliated entities,
for resale, lease or rental by the affiliate in the ordinary course of business.
For purposes of this subparagraph, "affiliate" or "affiliated" includes both direct
and indirect affiliates.; and
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§11, ¶A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 437, §10, is
further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (5) to read:
(5) The sale, to a person engaged in the business of renting automobiles, of
automobiles, integral parts of automobiles or accessories to automobiles for rental
or for use in an automobile rented for a period of less than one year.
Sec. 4. Application. This Act applies to sales occurring on or after January 1, 2026.